asdf/dicionarios/pt_pt.aff
SFX 45 Y 135
SFX 45   ar              o               [^-]ar          +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   r               s               ar              +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   ar              a               [^-]ar          +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   r               mos             ar              +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   r               is              ar              +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   r               m               ar              +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   ar              e               [^cgç]ar        +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   car             que             car             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   gar             gue             gar             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   çar             ce              çar             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   ar              es              [^cgç]ar        +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   car             ques            car             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   gar             gues            gar             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   çar             ces             çar             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   ar              emos            [^cgç]ar        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   car             quemos          car             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   gar             guemos          gar             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   çar             cemos           çar             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ar              eis             [^cgç]ar        +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   car             queis           car             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   gar             gueis           gar             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   çar             ceis            çar             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ar              em              [^cgç]ar        +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   car             quem            car             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   gar             guem            gar             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   çar             cem             çar             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ar              a               [^-]ar          +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   ar              e               [^cgç]ar        +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   car             que             car             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   gar             gue             gar             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   çar             ce              çar             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   ar              emos            [^cgç]ar        +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   car             quemos          car             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   gar             guemos          gar             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   çar             cemos           çar             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   r               i               ar              +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   ar              em              [^cgç]ar        +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   car             quem            car             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   gar             guem            gar             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   çar             cem             çar             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   er              o               [^cug-]er       +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   cer             ço              cer             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   ger             jo              ger             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   guer            go              guer            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   r               s               er              +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   er              e               er              +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   r               mos             er              +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   r               is              er              +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   r               m               er              +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   er              a               [^cug-]er       +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   cer             ça              cer             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   ger             ja              ger             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   guer            ga              guer            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   er              as              [^cug]er        +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   cer             ças             cer             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   ger             jas             ger             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   guer            gas             guer            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   er              amos            [^cug]er        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   cer             çamos           cer             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ger             jamos           ger             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   guer            gamos           guer            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   er              ais             [^cug]er        +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   cer             çais            cer             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ger             jais            ger             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   guer            gais            guer            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   er              am              [^cug]er        +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   cer             çam             cer             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ger             jam             ger             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   guer            gam             guer            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   er              e               er              +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   er              a               [^cug^-]er      +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   cer             ça              cer             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   ger             ja              ger             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   guer            ga              guer            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   er              amos            [^cu]er         +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   cer             çamos           cer             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   ger             jamos           ger             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   guer            gamos           guer            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   r               i               er              +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   er              am              [^cug]er        +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   cer             çam             cer             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   ger             jam             ger             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   guer            gam             guer            +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   ir              o               [^cug-]ir       +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   cir             ço              cir             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   gir             jo              gir             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   quir            co              quir            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   uir             o               guir            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   ir              es              ir              +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   ir              e               ir              +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 45   r               mos             ir              +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   r               s               ir              +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   ir              em              ir              +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 45   ir              a               [^cug-]ir       +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   cir             ça              cir             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   gir             ja              gir             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   quir            ca              quir            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   uir             a               guir            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   ir              as              [^cug]ir        +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   cir             ças             cir             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   gir             jas             gir             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   quir            cas             quir            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   uir             as              guir            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 45   ir              amos            [^cug]ir        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   cir             çamos           cir             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   gir             jamos           gir             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   quir            camos           quir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   uir             amos            guir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ir              ais             [^cug]ir        +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   cir             çais            cir             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   gir             jais            gir             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   quir            cais            quir            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   uir             ais             guir            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ir              am              [^cug]ir        +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   cir             çam             cir             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   gir             jam             gir             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   quir            cam             quir            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   uir             am              guir            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 45   ir              e               ir              +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   ir              a               [^cug-]ir       +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   cir             ça              cir             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   gir             ja              gir             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   quir            ca              quir            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   uir             a               guir            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 45   ir              amos            [^cug]ir        +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   cir             çamos           cir             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   gir             jamos           gir             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   quir            camos           quir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   uir             amos            guir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   ir              i               ir              +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   ir              am              [^cug]ir        +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   cir             çam             cir             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   gir             jam             gir             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   quir            cam             quir            +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 45   uir             am              guir            +P=3,N=p,T=i

SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46   0     ly         .
